Washington statutes.
RCW 35.23.101

Vacancies.

(1) The council of a second-class city may declare a council position vacant if the councilmember is absent for three consecutive regular meetings without permission of the council.

(2) A vacancy in an elective office shall occur and shall be filled as provided in chapter 42.12 RCW. An incumbent councilmember is eligible to be appointed to fill a vacancy in the office of mayor.

Vacancies in offices other than that of mayor or city councilmember shall be filled by appointment of the mayor.

(3) If there is a temporary vacancy in an appointive office due to illness, absence from the city or other temporary inability to act, the mayor may appoint a temporary appointee to exercise the duties of the office until the temporary disability of the incumbent is removed.

[ 2008 c 50 s 1; 1995 c 134 s 9. Prior: 1994 c 223 s 19; 1994 c 81 s 38; 1965 c 7 s 35.24.100; prior: (i) 1919 c 113 s 1; 1915 c 184 s 6; 1890 p 180 s 108; RRS s 9119. (ii) 1907 c 228 s 5, part; RRS s 9203, part. Formerly RCW 35.24.100.]

NOTES:

Vacancies in office of mayor filled from among city councilmembers: RCW 35.23.191.